Foma_files/able.foma
read lexc Desktop/foma_files/able.lexc
# Read the pre-defined lexicon
def Lexicon;        # Label this transducer "Lexicon"

def sib [{ch}|{sh}|{z}|{s}|{x}];

def YourRule1 	e "+" a b l e  -> a b l e;
def YourRule2   n "+" a b l  -> n n a b l ;
def YourRule3  	a b l e "+" i t y -> a b i l i t y  ;
def YourRule4  	 y "+" s -> i e s ;
def YourRule5   s -> es || sib "+" _;

def Cleanup "+" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o. YourRule1 .o. YourRule2 .o. YourRule3 .o. YourRule4 .o. YourRule5 .o. Cleanup;

pairs
